Washington statutes.
RCW 36.165.050

Recording requirements.

(1) A county shall record each C-PACER lien in the real property records of the county in which the property is located. The lien and release shall be prepared in conformity with chapter 65.04 RCW.

(2) The recording under subsection (1) of this section must contain:

(a) The legal description of the eligible property;

(b) The assessor's parcel number of the property;

(c) The grantor's name, which must be the same as the property owner on the assessment agreement;

(d) The grantee's name, which must be the county in which the property is located;

(e) The date on which the lien was created;

(f) The principal amount of the lien;

(g) The terms and length of the lien; and

(h) A copy of the voluntary assessment agreement between the county and the property owner.

(3) The county shall also record the assignment of the C-PACER lien from the county to the appropriate capital provider.

(4) The lien holder or assignee will record a release upon discharge of the lien. The lien holder may also record a partial release.

[ 2020 c 27 s 6.]